Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-15] Duration and term of stays;
co-defendants not in service. A stay of any action, proceeding,
attachment, or execution, ordered by any court under this chapter, shall be for
the period of military service and sixty days thereafter or any part of that
period, and may be subject to such terms as may be just, including payment in
installments of specified amounts and at such times as the court may fix.
Where the person in military service is a co-defendant with others, the
plaintiff may proceed against the others by leave of the court. [L 1994, c 257,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next